California statutes. Elections Code
If the provisions of two or more ordinances adopted at the same election conflict, the ordinance receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9322.

The enacting clause of an ordinance submitted to the voters of a district shall be substantially in the following form:

“The people of the ____ District do ordain as follows:”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9323.

No ordinance proposed by initiative petition and adopted either by the district board without submission to the voters or adopted by the voters shall be repealed or amended except by a vote of the people, unless provision is otherwise made in the original ordinance. In all other respects, an ordinance proposed by initiative petition and adopted shall have the same force and effect as any ordinance adopted by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Referendum [9340. - 9342.]

9340.

The voters of any district that is a local public entity as defined by Section 900.4 of the Government Code, and to which Section 9300 applies, shall have the right to petition for referendum on legislative acts of the district in the same manner and subject to the same rules as are set forth in Sections 9141, 9142, 9143, 9144, 9145, 9146, and 9147, except that all computations referred to in those sections and officers of the county mentioned in those sections shall be construed to refer to comparable computations and officers of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 199, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9341.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9340, ordinances authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds by a school district, special district, or any other local agency as part of a joint powers entity pursuant to Section 6547 of the Government Code, shall not take effect for 60 days.

(b) When the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the school district, special district, or any other local agency described in subdivision (a) exceeds 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures of at least 5 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the school district, special district, or any other local agency for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election. When the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the school district, special district, or any other local agency is less than 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures of at least 10 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the school district, special district, or any other local agency for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.

(c) For the purpose of submitting the question to the voters pursuant to subdivision (b), the ballot wording shall approximate the following:

“Shall the ___________________,
(school district,
special district,
or any other local
 agency name)
 as a member of the _____________,
 (joint powers
entity name)
 authorize the issuance of revenue bonds by the joint powers entity in the amount of $____ pursuant to ordinance number ____ dated ____, the bonds to be used for the following purposes and to be redeemed in the following manner: ________?”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9341.5.

The proponent of a referendum may withdraw the referendum at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 569, Sec. 4.   (SB 681)   Effective October 8, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9342.

The governing board of any district to which Section 9340 applies may refer legislative questions to the voters of the district in the same manner as the board of supervisors may refer county questions pursuant to Section 9140.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Mailings [9360. - 9360.]

9360.

Whenever the elections official is required to mail official matter, as provided in Sections 9312, 9315, and 9317, only one copy of each such official matter shall be mailed to a postal address where two or more registered voters have the same surname and the same postal address.

This section shall only apply if the legislative body of the district adopts this section, and the elections official conducting the election approves of the procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Public Examination [9380. - 9380.]

9380.

(a) The elections official shall make a copy of the materials referred to in Sections 9312, 9315, and 9317 available for public examination in his or her office for a period of 10 calendar days immediately following the filing deadline for submission of those documents. Any person may obtain a copy of the materials from the elections official for use outside of the elections official’s office. The elections official may charge a fee to any person obtaining a copy of the material. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the elections official in providing the copy.

(b) (1) During the 10-calendar-day public examination period provided by this section,
 any voter of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held, or the elections official, himself or herself, may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any material to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-calendar-day public examination period.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall be issued only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with this chapter, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law.

(3) The elections official shall be named as respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as real parties in interest. In the case of the elections official
 bringing the mandamus or injunctive action, the board of supervisors of the county shall be named as the respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.   (AB 1626)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Bond Issues [9400. - 9405.]

9400.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter applies to all bond issues proposed by a county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision, or by any agency, department, or board thereof, the security for which constitutes a lien on the property for ad valorem taxes within the jurisdiction and the proposal for which is required to be submitted to the voters for approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 289, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9401.

(a) In connection with each bond issue specified in Section 9400, a statement shall be mailed to the voters with the sample ballot for the bond election. The statement required by this section shall be filed with the elections official conducting the election not later than the 88th day before the election, and shall include all of the following:

(1) The best estimate from official sources of the average annual tax rate that would be required to be levied to fund that bond issue over the entire duration of the bond debt service, based on assessed valuations available at the time of the election or a projection based on experience within the same jurisdiction or other demonstrable factors. The estimate shall also identify the final fiscal year in which the tax is
 anticipated to be collected.

(2) The best estimate from official sources of the highest tax rate that would be required to be levied to fund that bond issue, and an estimate of the year in which that rate will apply, based on assessed valuations available at the time of the election or a projection based on experience within the same jurisdiction or other demonstrable factors.

(3) The best estimate from official sources of the total debt service, including the principal and interest, that would be required to be repaid if all the bonds are issued and sold. The estimate may include information about the assumptions used to determine the estimate.

(b) In addition, the statement may contain a declaration of policy of the legislative or governing body of the applicable jurisdiction, proposing to use revenues other than
 ad valorem taxes to fund the bond issue, and the best estimate from official sources of these revenues and the reduction in the tax rate levied to fund the bond issue resulting from the substitution of revenue.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “tax rate” means tax rate per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of assessed valuation on
 all property to be taxed to fund a bond issue described in Section 9400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9402.

All official materials, including any voter information guide prepared, sponsored, or distributed by the jurisdiction that has proposed the bond issue or that is financed in whole or part by funds furnished by that jurisdiction, directed at or including a bond issue proposal, but excluding a notice of election required by law to be posted or published, shall contain a statement of the tax rate data specified in Section 9401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 54.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.

Failure to comply with this chapter shall not affect the validity of any bond issue following the sale and delivery of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

The Legislature declares that the essence of compliance with this chapter is good faith in presenting to voters the most accurate available information for their use in effecting comparisons and exercising judgment in casting their ballots.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9405.

Whenever the elections official is required to mail a statement, as provided in Section 9401, only one copy of the statement shall be mailed to a postal address where two or more registered voters have the same surname and the same postal address.

This section shall only apply if the legislative body adopts this section and the election official conducting the election approves of the procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. School District Elections [9500. - 9509.]

9500.

(a) Whenever a school measure qualifies for a place on the ballot, the county elections official shall transmit a copy of the measure to the county counsel or to the district attorney in a county that has no county counsel.

(b) The county counsel or district attorney shall prepare an impartial analysis of the measure, showing the effect of the measure on the existing law and the operation of the measure. The analysis shall include a statement indicating that the measure was placed on the ballot by the governing board of the district. The analysis shall be printed preceding the arguments for and against the measure. The analysis shall not exceed 500
 words in length.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 265, Sec. 5.   (AB 354)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9501.

(a) The governing board of the school district or a member or members of the governing board, or an individual voter who is eligible to vote on the measure, or bona fide association of citizens, or a combination of such voters and associations may file a written argument for or against any school measure. An argument shall not exceed 300 words in length. The elections official shall cause an argument for and an argument against the measure, if submitted, to be printed, and shall include the arguments, preceded by the analysis, in the county voter information guide.

(b) Printed arguments submitted to voters in accordance with this section shall be titled either “Argument in Favor of
 Measure ____” or “Argument Against Measure ____,” accordingly, the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. At the discretion of the elections official, the word “Proposition” may be substituted for the word “Measure” in the titles. Words used in the title shall not be counted when determining the length of any measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 55.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9501.5.

A ballot argument shall not be accepted under this article unless accompanied by the printed name and signature or printed names and signatures of the person or persons submitting it or, if submitted on behalf of an organization, the name of the organization and the printed name and signature of at least one of its principal officers.

No more than five signatures shall appear with any argument submitted under this article. If any argument is signed by more than five persons, the signatures of the first five shall be printed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

Based on the time reasonably necessary to prepare and print the arguments, and to permit the 10-calendar-day public examination as provided in Section 9509, the person conducting the election shall fix and determine a reasonable date prior to the election after which no arguments for or against any school measure may be submitted to him or her for printing and distribution to the voters. Notice of the date fixed shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Arguments may be changed until and including the date fixed by the person conducting the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

(a) If more than one argument for or more than one argument against any school measure is submitted to the person conducting the election within the time prescribed, the person conducting the election shall select one of the arguments in favor and one of the arguments against the measure for printing and distribution to the voters. In selecting the arguments, the person conducting the election shall give preference and priority, in the order named, to the arguments of the following:

(1) The governing board of the district or a member or members of the board.

(2) The individual voter, or bona fide associations of citizens, or combination of voters and associations, who are the bona fide sponsors or
 proponents of the measure.

(3) Bona fide associations of citizens.

(4) Individual voters who are eligible to vote on the measure.

(b) In order to enable the person conducting the election to determine whether it qualifies as a bona fide association of citizens, an organization or association submitting an argument for or against a school measure shall submit with its argument a copy of one of the following:

(1) Its articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership documents, bylaws, or similar documents.

(2) Letterhead containing the name of the organization and its principal officers.

(3) If the organization or
 association is a primarily formed committee established to support or oppose the measure, its statement of organization filed pursuant to Section 84101 of the Government Code.

(c) In selecting an argument from among bona fide associations of citizens, the person conducting the election shall not consider the type of documentation submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) or the form of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 65.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9504.

(a) When an argument in favor and an argument against a measure have been selected for publication in the voter information pamphlet the elections official responsible for conducting the election shall send copies of the argument in favor of the measure to the authors of the argument against the measure and copies of the arguments against the measure to the authors of the argument in favor. The authors may prepare and submit rebuttal arguments not exceeding 250 words, or may authorize in writing any other person or persons to prepare, submit, or sign the rebuttal argument. The rebuttal arguments shall be submitted to the elections official conducting the election no later than a date designated by the elections official.

(b) Rebuttal arguments shall be printed in the same manner as the direct arguments. Each rebuttal argument shall immediately follow the direct argument that it seeks to rebut and shall be titled “Rebuttal to Argument in Favor of Measure (or Proposition) ____,” or “Rebuttal to Argument Against Measure (or Proposition) ____,” the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. Words used in the title may not be counted when determining the length of any rebuttal argument.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 228, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9508.

Whenever a proposition relating to the approval of district bonds and a proposition, which is conditioned by the State Allocation Board on the approval of the bond issue, relating to the acceptance and expenditure of state school building aid funds, are to be submitted to the voters of a district on the same ballot, both propositions may be combined in such a manner that the proposed obligations of the district are clearly expressed, and the voter may cast one “Yes” or “No” vote upon the combined proposition.

The combined proposition shall, as nearly as practicable, be worded in accordance with the statutory requirements for the wording of each component proposition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9509.

(a) The elections official shall make a copy of the materials referred to in Sections 9500, 9501, and 9504 available for public examination in his or her office for a period of 10 calendar days immediately following the filing deadline for submission of those documents. Any person may obtain a copy of the materials from the elections official for use outside of the elections official’s office. The elections official may charge a fee to any person obtaining a copy of the material. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the elections official in providing the copy.

(b) (1) During the 10-calendar-day public examination period provided by this section,
 any voter of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held, or the elections official, himself or herself, may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the materials to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-calendar-day public examination period.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall be issued only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with this chapter, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law.

(3) The elections official shall be named as respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as real parties in interest. In the case of the
 elections official bringing the mandamus or injunctive action, the board of supervisors of the county shall be named as the respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   (AB 1626)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. General Provisions [9600. - 9611.]

9600.

All arguments concerning measures filed pursuant to this division shall be accompanied by the following form statement, to be signed by each proponent and by each author, if different, of the argument: The undersigned proponent(s) or author(s) of the (primary/rebuttal)argument (in favor of/against)ballot proposition (name or number)at the (title of election)election for the (jurisdiction)to be held on (date) hereby statethat this argument is true and correct to the best of 
(his/her/their)knowledge and belief.Signed Date

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9601.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, whenever any ballot arguments for or against any measure submitted to the voters for approval are authorized, these arguments may be withdrawn by their proponents at any time prior to and including the final date fixed for filing arguments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.

A voter who has signed an initiative or referendum petition, and who subsequently wishes their name withdrawn, may do so by filing a written request for the withdrawal with the appropriate elections official that includes the name or title of the petition and the voter’s name, residence address, and signature. This request shall be filed in the elections official’s office prior to the date the petition is filed. A written request made under this section shall not constitute a petition or paper for purposes of Section
 104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 166, Sec. 3.   (AB 2967)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9603.

(a) Each city, county, school district, community college district, county board of education, and special district may hold, at its discretion, an advisory election on any date on which that jurisdiction is currently permitted to hold a regular or special election for the purpose of allowing voters within the jurisdiction, or a portion thereof, to voice their opinions on substantive issues, or to indicate to the local legislative body approval or disapproval of the ballot proposal.

(b) An advisory vote will be indicated as a ballot heading, above the ballot proposal, and by only the following description: “Advisory Vote Only.”

(c) As used in this section, “advisory vote” means an indication of general voter opinion regarding the ballot proposal. The results of the advisory vote will in no manner be controlling on the sponsoring legislative body.

(d) An advisory election may be held in territory outside of the jurisdiction of the local entity calling the advisory election if the ballot proposal affects the residents of the territory. The sponsoring legislative body shall determine the territory in which the advisory election shall be held. However, the conduct of an advisory election in territory outside of the jurisdiction of the local entity shall only be held if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) A regular election or special election is to be held in that territory.

(2) The advisory election can be consolidated with it.

(3) The board of supervisors of the county in which the outside territory is located approves the consolidation.

(e) An advisory election shall not be consolidated with an election if the ballot’s capacity will be exceeded because of the addition of the advisory election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9604.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, any person may engage in good faith bargaining between competing interests to secure legislative approval of matters embraced in a statewide or local initiative or referendum measure, and the proponents may, as a result of these negotiations, withdraw the measure at any time before filing the petition with the appropriate elections official.

(2) Withdrawal of a statewide initiative or referendum measure pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be effective upon receipt by the Secretary of State of a written notice of withdrawal, signed by all proponents of the measure.

(3) Withdrawal of a local initiative or referendum measure pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be effective upon receipt by the appropriate local elections official of a written notice of withdrawal, signed by all proponents of the measure.

(b) (1) In addition to the procedure under subdivision (a), the proponents of a statewide initiative or referendum measure may withdraw the measure after filing the petition with the appropriate elections official at any time before the Secretary of State certifies that the measure has qualified for the ballot pursuant to Section 9033.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), withdrawal of a statewide initiative or referendum measure after filing the petition with the appropriate elections official shall be
 effective upon receipt by the Secretary of State of a written notice of withdrawal, signed by a majority of the proponents of the measure.

(c) (1) After filing the petition with the appropriate elections official at any time before the Secretary of State certifies that a statewide initiative or referendum measure has qualified for the ballot pursuant to Section 9033, the proponents may file with the Secretary of State a written notice of withdrawal that is contingent on the enactment of a particular legislative measure. In the written notice, the proponents shall identify the publication date of the most recent version of the legislative measure. The Secretary of State shall reject any notice of contingent withdrawal that is contingent on any action other than the enactment of a particular legislative measure.

(2) The Secretary of State shall deem a written notice of contingent withdrawal of a statewide initiative or referendum measure to be effective if the legislative measure identified in the notice is enacted and given a chapter number by the Secretary of State before the Secretary of State certifies that the statewide initiative or referendum measure has qualified for the ballot pursuant to Section 9033.

(3) (A) If the legislative measure is not given a chapter number by the Secretary of State before the Secretary of State certifies that the statewide initiative or referendum measure has qualified for the ballot pursuant to Section 9033, or if it is amended after the notice is filed with the Secretary of State, the notice of contingent withdrawal shall
 not be effective.

(B) If the contingent withdrawal fails pursuant to subparagraph (A), the proponents may file a new notice of contingent withdrawal at any time before the Secretary of State certifies that the initiative or referendum measure has qualified for the ballot.

(4) The proponents may file a written notice with the Secretary of State to cancel the contingent withdrawal at any time before the legislative measure is enacted and given a chapter number by the
 Secretary of State.

(5) A contingent withdrawal, or a cancellation of a contingent withdrawal, filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to this subdivision shall be signed by at least a majority of the proponents of the initiative or referendum measure.

(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this subdivision, the proponents of a statewide initiative or referendum measure may file a written notice pursuant to subdivision (b) to withdraw the measure at any time before the Secretary of State certifies that the measure has qualified for the ballot. A notice of withdrawal filed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall take precedence over any notice of contingent withdrawal on file with the Secretary of State pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The proponents of a statewide initiative or referendum measure may file a written notice of withdrawal pursuant to subdivisions (b) or (c) with the Secretary of State no later than 5 p.m. on the day the Secretary of State certifies that the statewide initiative or referendum measure has qualified for the ballot pursuant to Section 9033.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 483, Sec. 1.   (SB 297)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9605.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a legislative body has ordered that a measure or proposal be submitted to the voters of any jurisdiction at a special election, the order of election shall not be amended or withdrawn after the 83rd day prior to the election.

The order of election shall be amended or withdrawn upon the filing of a resolution by the legislative body stating the specifics concerning the amendment or withdrawal. The resolution shall be filed with the election official not later than the 83rd
 day prior to the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9606.

A county elections official who is required, pursuant to this division, to examine signatures on an initiative, referendum, recall, nomination, or other election petition, may employ temporary assistants, as required, to complete the necessary procedure. The costs for the temporary assistants shall be paid by the jurisdiction in which the election on the proposition is intended to be held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9607.

The proponents of an initiative measure shall ensure that any person, company, or other organization that is paid, or who volunteers, to solicit signatures to qualify the proposed measure for the ballot shall receive instruction on the requirements and prohibitions imposed by state law with respect to circulation of the petition and signature gathering thereon, with an emphasis on the prohibition on the use of signatures on an initiative petition for a purpose other than qualification of the proposed measure for the ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 726, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9608.

(a) A proponent of an initiative measure shall execute and submit, along with the request for a title and summary for the proposed measure, a signed statement that reads as follows: I, ___, acknowledge that it is a misdemeanor under state law (Section 18650 of the Elections Code) to knowingly or willfully allow the signatures on an
 initiative petition to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the proposed measure for the ballot. I certify that I will not knowingly or willfully allow the signatures for this initiative to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the measure for the ballot.(Signature of Proponent)Dated this ________ day of __________, 20___(b) The certification required by subdivision (a) shall be kept on file by the agency authorized to prepare the title and summary for the proposed initiative measure for not less than eight months after the certification of the results of the election for which the measure qualified, or if the measure, for any reason, is not submitted to the voters, eight months
 after the deadline for submission of the petition to the elections official.

(c) Failure to comply with this section shall not invalidate any signatures on a state or local initiative petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 726, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9609.

(a) Prior to allowing a person to circulate an initiative petition for signatures, the person, company official, or other organizational officer who is in charge of signature gathering shall execute and submit to the proponents a signed statement that reads as follows: I, ___, acknowledge that it is a misdemeanor under state law
 (Section 18650 of the Elections Code) to knowingly or willfully allow the signatures on an initiative petition to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the proposed measure for the ballot. I certify that I will not knowingly or willfully allow the signatures for this initiative to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the measure for the ballot.(Signature of Official)Dated this ________ day of __________, 20___(b) The certification required by subdivision (a) shall be kept on file by the proponents of the proposed initiative measure for not less than eight months after the certification of the results of the election for which the measure qualified, or if the measure, for any
 reason, is not submitted to the voters, eight months after the deadline for submission of the petition to the elections official.

(c) Failure to comply with this section shall not invalidate any signatures on a state or local initiative petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 726, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9610.

(a) Prior to soliciting signatures on an initiative petition, a circulator shall execute and submit to the person, company official, or other organizational officer who is in charge of signature gathering a signed statement that reads as follows: I, ___, acknowledge that it is a misdemeanor under state law (Section 18650 of the
 Elections Code) to knowingly or willfully allow the signatures on an initiative petition to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the proposed measure for the ballot. I certify that I will not knowingly or willfully allow the signatures for this initiative to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the measure for the ballot.(Signature of Circulator)Dated this ________ day of __________, 20___(b) The certification required by subdivision (a) shall be kept on file by the person, company official, or other organizational officer who is in charge of signature gathering for the proposed initiative measure for not less than eight months after the certification of the results of the
 election for which the measure qualified, or if the measure, for any reason, is not submitted to the voters, eight months after the deadline for submission of the petition to the elections official.

(c) This section shall not apply to unpaid circulators of state or local initiative petitions.

(d) Failure to comply with this section shall not invalidate any signatures on a state or local initiative petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 726, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9611.

(a) This section applies to district elections conducted in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) or school district elections conducted in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500), if the boundaries of the district or school district contain more than one county. The provisions of this section prevail over any provision in those chapters to the extent they conflict.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “lead county” has the following meanings:

(1) For district elections, “lead county” means the county with the most voters within the district bounds.

(2) For school district elections,
 “lead county” means the county whose superintendent of schools covers the district.

(c) The elections official for the lead county shall work with the other counties within the district bounds to establish the deadlines for the submittal of arguments for and against a district or school district measure and rebuttal arguments.

(d) Authors shall submit arguments only to the lead county, who shall select which arguments will be printed in the voter information guide in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500), as applicable. The elections official for the lead county shall electronically transmit a scanned copy of the selected arguments, along with any accompanying forms, to the elections official of each other county in the district or school district. An elections official who receives arguments selected by the lead
 county shall include the arguments in the printed and electronic versions of their county voter information guide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 664, Sec. 1.   (AB 773)   Effective October 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. LOCAL, SPECIAL, VACANCY, AND CONSOLIDATED ELECTIONS [10000. - 10735.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [10000. - 10010.]



  CHAPTER 1. Voters and Procedure [10000. - 10005.]

10000.

Every person is entitled to vote at a local, special, or consolidated election who is registered in any one of the precincts which compose the local, special, or consolidated election precincts, in accordance with this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all statewide special elections shall be called, conducted, and canvassed as provided by this code for the calling, conducting, and canvassing of general elections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

The governing body of any city or district may by resolution request the board of supervisors of the county to permit the county elections official to render specified services to the city or district relating to the conduct of an election. Subject to approval of the board of supervisors, these services shall be performed by the county elections official.

The resolution of the governing body of the city or district shall specify the services requested.

Any city that requests the board of supervisors to permit the elections official to prepare the city’s election materials shall, if the board of supervisors agrees to provide such services, supply the county elections official with a list of its precincts, or consolidated precincts, as applicable, no later than 61 days before the election.

Unless other arrangements satisfactory to the county have been made, the city or district shall reimburse the county in full for the services performed upon presentation of a bill to the city or district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

If the governing body of any special district fails to call or to take any other steps necessary to the holding of the regular district election at which any member or members of the governing body of the district are to be selected, the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located, upon being notified of this fact by any voter in the district, may call a special election within the district for the selection of the governing board member or members involved. The election shall be held not later than 90 days after it is called by the board of supervisors, and shall be conducted in the same manner as the regular district election. The costs of the special election shall be borne by the district for which the election is held.
